Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Cross references.

Taking of private property for public purposes generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. III, Para. II, and Art III, Sec. VI, Para II.

Prohibition against abridgement of right of eminent domain, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. III.

Exercise of right of eminent domain for community redevelopment work, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. VII.

Powers of counties and municipalities to exercise right of eminent domain, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. V.

Allocation of award upon exercise of power of eminent domain affecting condominiums, §

44-3-97

.

Authority of railroad companies to exercise power of eminent domain, §§

46-8-121

,

46-8-124

.

Taxation of special franchises, §

48-5-420

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article discussing eminent domain procedure in this country, and advocating reforms focusing on a unified method for condemnation, see 11 Mercer L. Rev. 245 (1960).

For note on computation of compensation for condemned lands where value is enhanced by announcement of proposed improvement, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 488 (1964).

For note, “A Study of the Development and Current Status in Georgia of Inverse Condemnation Suits by a Landowner for Taking by Aerial Flights,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 232 (1965).

For article, “Eminent Domain, Police Power and Urban Renewal: Compensation for Interim Depreciation in Land Values,” see 7 Ga. L. Rev. 226 (1972).

For article discussing extraterritorial condemnation of property by municipalities, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (1977).

For article discussing developments in the law of eminent domain in 1976 to 1977, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 219 (1977).

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments in Georgia’s real property laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1979).

For article surveying Georgia cases in the area of local government law from June 1979 through May 1980, see 32 Mercer L. Rev. 137 (1980).

For article, “A Critical Review of the Law of Business Loss Claims in Georgia Eminent Domain Jurisprudence,” see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 11 (1999).